Maryland, session 2026, SB0992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” MEANS A COMMERCIAL OR
INDUSTRIAL CUSTOMER FOR RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE THAT:
1. HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE AN AGGREGATE
MONTHLY DEMAND OF AT LEAST 25 MEGAWATTS; AND
2. HAS OR IS PROJECTED TO HAVE A LOAD FACTOR OF
MORE THAN 80%.
(II) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A WATER
COMPANY OR SEWAGE DISPOSAL COMPANY.
(4) “ON–SITE BACKUP GENERATING FACILITY” MEANS A
GENERATING FACILITY THAT IS:
(I) NOT CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM; AND
(II) CAPABLE OF SERVING AT LEAST 50% OF THE LOAD
REQUIRED BY A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER.
(B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND IN
ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 4–212 OF THIS ARTICLE, A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER SHALL REGISTER WITH THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION BEFORE THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER INTERCONNECTS WITH THE
ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE FEE FOR THE
REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 992 3
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION, BY ORDER
OR REGULATION, SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO REGISTER LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMERS.
(2) THE REGISTRATION PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION
SHALL:
(I) APPLY TO NEW OR EXPANDED INTERCONNECTION OF LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS;
(II) REQUIRE A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO DISCLOSE TO THE
COMMISSION:
1. WHETHER THE CUSTOMER IS PURSUING A
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR INTERCONNECTION REQUEST WITH ANOTHER ELECTRIC
COMPANY IN THE STATE, OR IN ANOTHER STATE IN THE PJM REGION, AND
WHETHER THE APPROVAL OF THE SIMILAR INTERCONNECTION REQUEST WOULD
CAUSE THE CUSTOMER TO MATERIALLY CHANGE, DELAY, OR WITHDRAW THE
INTERCONNECTION REQUEST;
2. WHETHER THE CUSTOMER INTENDS TO:
A. ACQUIRE OR BUILD ENERGY GENERATION SOLELY
FOR THE CUSTOMER;
B. USE ENERGY SOLELY FROM THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM; OR
C. BOTH;
3. INFORMATION ABOUT THE TYPE OF ON–SITE BACKUP
GENERATING FACILITY THAT WOULD BE USED IN THE EVENT OF A SYSTEM OUTAGE;
AND
4. INFORMATION ABOUT:
A. THE AMOUNT OF WATER THAT WOULD BE USED EACH
MONTH;
B. THE SOURCE OF THE WATER THAT WOULD BE USED;
AND

SENATE BILL 992
C. THE STATUS OF APPLICATIONS FOR WATER
APPROPRIATION OR USE PERMITS SUBMITTED TO THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
THE ENVIRONMENT OR A WATER UTILITY OWNED BY THE STATE OR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT;
(III) INCLUDE A METHOD FOR THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO
DEMONSTRATE SITE CONTROL FOR THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER’S PREMISES THROUGH OWNERSHIP, LEASE CONTROL, OR ANOTHER
METHOD ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION;
(IV) INCLUDE A UNIFORM FINANCIAL COMMITMENT
REQUIREMENT FOR THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S DEVELOPMENT OF
TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE THAT IS NEEDED TO SERVE THE LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER, INCLUDING:
1. SECURITY PROVIDED ON A DOLLAR PER MEGAWATT
BASIS, AS SET BY THE COMMISSION;
2. TRANSMISSION CONSTRUCTION FINANCING;
3. SECURITY UNDER AN AGREEMENT REQUIRING A
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER TO PAY FOR EQUIPMENT OR SERVICES IN ADVANCE OF ANY
ESTABLISHED ELECTRIC SERVICE; OR
4. ANY OTHER FORM OF FINANCIAL COMMITMENT
REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION;
(V) ESTABLISH A PROCEDURE TO ALLOW THE COMMISSION TO
ACCESS, WHILE MAINTAINING CONFIDENTIALITY, ANY INFORMATION COLLECTED
BY THE INTERCONNECTING ELECTRIC COMPANY FOR TRANSMISSION PLANNING
ANALYSES; AND
(VI) ESTABLISH ANY OTHER STANDARDS THAT THE
COMMISSION CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL CERTIFY WHETHER A REGISTRATION
UNDER THIS SECTION IS COMPLETE WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THE REGISTRATION
INFORMATION IS INCOMPLETE, THE COMMISSION MAY EXTEND ANY TIME FRAME
PROVIDED IN AN ORDER OR REGULATION ESTABLISHING THE REGISTRATION
PROCESS UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 992 5
(E) A DATA CENTER THAT IS A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER SHALL BE
CONSIDERED A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER FOR THE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION
UNDER § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE IF THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER:
(1) REGISTERS UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) AGREES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM
UNDER § 7–1008 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(3) (I) PROVIDES ENOUGH BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY
GENERATION TO FULLY OPERATE THE DATA CENTER; OR
(II) AGREES TO PURCHASE 100% RENEWABLE ENERGY
LOCATED IN THE PJM SERVICE TERRITORY TO FULLY OPERATE THE DATA CENTER.
(F) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION AND
ANY OTHER AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION TO CURTAIL OR RESTRICT LOAD TO A
CUSTOMER, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE THAT:
(I) ANY CURTAILMENT ORDER FROM PJM ASSIGNED TO AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY SERVING ONE OR MORE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS BE PASSED
THROUGH TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS ONLY AND NOT ASSIGNED OR PASSED
THROUGH TO ANY OTHER CUSTOMER;
(II) ANY FINANCIAL OBLIGATION ASSIGNED TO AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY AS A RESULT OF AN ORDER FROM PJM FOR PROCUREMENT OF NEW
ENERGY CAPACITY AS A RESULT OF THE INTERCONNECTION OF A LARGE LOAD
CUSTOMER BE PASSED THROUGH TO THE LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER;
(III) ANY LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER WHOSE INTERCONNECTION TO
THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM REQUIRES AN ORDER FROM PJM FOR THE PROCUREMENT
OF NEW ENERGY CAPACITY TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL SECURITY TO THE STATE TO
ENSURE THAT RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS ARE HELD HARMLESS FOR COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE NEW ENERGY CAPACITY PROCUREMENT; AND
(IV) ANY LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER APPLYING FOR NEW SERVICE
PROVIDE TO PJM:
1. EXPECTED LOAD USAGE;
2. EXPECTED PEAK LOAD USAGE;

SENATE BILL 992
3. ANY PREEXISTING REQUIREMENTS OR CONTRACTS
THAT ARE CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO COMPLETION OF CONSTRUCTION OR
INTERCONNECTION; AND
4. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSION OR PJM.
(2) NOTHING IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS
INTENDED TO PROHIBIT:
(I) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY FROM TAKING ANY ACTIONS TO
MAINTAIN SYSTEM RELIABILITY; OR
(II) A LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER FROM PARTICIPATING IN THE
DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM UNDER § 7–1008 OF THIS TITLE.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE REGISTRATION PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
7–1008.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–321
OF THIS TITLE.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A DEMAND RESPONSE PROGRAM
FOR LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL OFFER EACH LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER THAT
PARTICIPATES IN THE PROGRAM THE OPTION OF CONTRACTING FOR:
(1) 6 NONCONSECUTIVE 4–HOUR PERIODS OF LOAD MANAGEMENT OR
DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT TIME SLOTS PER CALENDAR YEAR; OR
(2) 10 NONCONSECUTIVE 10–HOUR PERIODS OF LOAD MANAGEMENT
OR DEMAND–SIDE MANAGEMENT TIME SLOTS PER CALENDAR YEAR.

SENATE BILL 992 7
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A CLEAR COMPENSATION STRUCTURE OR FINANCIAL
INCENTIVES FOR PROGRAM PARTICIPATION;
(2) ESTABLISH A CLEARLY DEFINED PENALTY SYSTEM FOR
NONPERFORMANCE DURING ANY FORCE MAJEURE EVENTS BY A PARTICIPATING
LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER;
(3) ESTABLISH A DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS; AND
(4) ESTABLISH MULTIPLE NOTIFICATION AND COMMUNICATION
CHANNELS FOR PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMERS.
(E) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE PARTICIPATING LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMERS:
(1) 24 HOURS OF ADVANCE NOTICE OF POTENTIAL DEMAND
RESPONSE PERIODS; AND
(2) 30 MINUTES OF NOTICE BEFORE EACH DEMAND RESPONSE
PERIOD.
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) PROHIBIT BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES
FROM BEING INCLUDED IN A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S LOAD;
(2) DEVELOP GUIDELINES AND LIMITATIONS FOR CHARGING
BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES DURING CERTAIN PEAK
DEMAND, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(3) ESTABLISH A METHOD FOR MEASURING A PARTICIPATING LARGE
LOAD CUSTOMER’S DEMAND RESPONSE PERFORMANCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) IN MEASURING A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER’S DEMAND
RESPONSE PERFORMANCE, THE COMMISSION SHALL FACTOR IN:
(1) NEW VIRTUAL POWER PLANT AGGREGATION OPTIONS
DEVELOPED BY ELECTRIC COMPANIES;

SENATE BILL 992
(2) FRONT–OF–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITIES; AND
(3) NONWIRE ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING GRID ENHANCING
TECHNOLOGIES, THAT FEED ELECTRICITY BACK TO THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(H) A PARTICIPATING LARGE LOAD CUSTOMER CONSTRUCTING A
BEHIND–THE–METER ENERGY STORAGE FACILITY UNDER THE PROGRAM IS EXEMPT
FROM THE REQUIREMENTS TO:
(1) OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY
UNDER § 7–207 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(2) OBTAIN COMMISSION APPROVAL UNDER § 7–207.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(5) (i) “Qualified data center” means:
1. a data center located in the State in which an individual
or a corporation, within 3 years after submitting an application for the sales and use tax
exemption under this section, has:
[1.] A. for a data center located within a Tier I area,
invested at least $2,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least
five qualified positions; or
[2.] B. for a data center located in any other area of the
State, invested at least $5,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created
at least five qualified positions; OR

SENATE BILL 992 9
2. A DATA CENTER THAT HAS MET THE REQUIREMENTS
OF § 7–321(E) OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(ii) “Qualified data center” includes:
1. a data center that is a co–located or hosting data center
where equipment, space, and bandwidth are available to lease to multiple customers; and
2. an enterprise data center owned and operated by the
company it supports.
(6) (i) “Qualified data center personal property” means personal
property purchased or leased to establish or operate a data center.
(ii) “Qualified data center personal property” includes:
1. computer equipment or enabling software used for the
processing, storage, retrieval, or communication of data, including servers, routers,
connections, and other enabling hardware used in the operation of that equipment;
2. heating, ventilation, and air–conditioning and mechanical
systems, including chillers, cooling towers, air–handling units, pumps, energy storage or
energy efficiency technology, and other capital equipment used in the operation of that
equipment; and
3. equipment necessary for the generation, transformation,
transmission, distribution, or management of electricity, including exterior substations,
generators, transformers, unit substations, uninterruptible power supply systems,
batteries, power distribution units, remote power panels, and any other capital equipment
necessary for these purposes.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of qualified data center
personal property for use at a qualified data center if the buyer provides the vendor with
evidence of eligibility for the exemption issued by the Comptroller.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.